Utah statutes.
17-20-3.   County clerk -- Record of notaries public.

The county clerk of each county receiving certifications of notaries public from the lieutenant governor shall keep and maintain an indexed record for that purpose, showing the names of all persons holding notarial commissions, with the dates of issuance and expiration.



Amended by Chapter 136, 2003 General Session

